Utah statutes.
49-18-701.   Judges' mandatory retirement age.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), a judge shall retire upon attaining
the age of 75 years.
(2)  A judge serving on July 1, 1996, who is 75 years of age or older on July
1, 1996, or who attains 75 years of age prior to the judge's next retention
election may not be a candidate in that retention election and shall retire on
or before December 31 of the year in which the judge would have been subject
to a retention election.
